Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.16
Commercial hazardous waste management facility; application; hearing by local governing body.

If the application for a commercial hazardous waste management facility contains all of the information required by the department, the director shall send a copy of the application, of the committee's report, and of any response by the applicant to the report to the county board of the county if the proposed facility will be located outside the zoning jurisdiction of a city or village or to the city council or board of trustees if it will be located within the zoning jurisdiction of a city or village. A hearing shall be held by the county board, city council, or board of trustees within forty-five days of receipt of the copy of the application.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 10.